Hawaii statutes.
§502-52 Signatures of certain state
officers, acknowledgments not required. In the case of an official
signature entitled to be judicially noticed pursuant to section 626-1, rule 901
or 902, the signature shall suffice to show due execution by the officer
signing the instrument and the officer is not required to acknowledge the
instrument in order to entitle it to be recorded. [L 1945, c 84, §2; RL 1955,
§343-36; HRS §502-52; am L 1985, c 68, §19]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next